Missouri, session 2026, SB1441.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 301.020 and 307.350, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 301.020 and 307.350, to read as follows:
301.020. 1. Every owner of a motor vehicle or
trailer, which shall be operated or driven upon the highways
of this state, except as herein otherwise expressly
provided, shall annually file, by mail or otherwise, in the
office of the director of revenue, an application for
registration on a blank to be furnished by the director of
revenue for that purpose containing:
(1) A brief description of the motor vehicle or
trailer to be registered, including the name of the
manufacturer, the vehicle identification number, the amount
of motive power of the motor vehicle, stated in figures of
horsepower and whether the motor vehicle is to be registered
as a motor vehicle primarily for business use as defined in
section 301.010;
(2) The name, the applicant's identification number
and address of the owner of such motor vehicle or trailer;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1441 2
(3) The gross weight of the vehicle and the desired
load in pounds if the vehicle is a commercial motor vehicle
or trailer.
2. If the vehicle is a motor vehicle primarily for
business use as defined in section 301.010 and if such
vehicle is [ten years of age or less] model year 2013 or
newer and has less than one hundred fifty thousand miles on
the odometer, the director of revenue shall retain the
odometer information provided in the vehicle inspection
report, and provide for prompt access to such information,
together with the vehicle identification number for the
motor vehicle to which such information pertains, for a
period of ten years after the receipt of such information.
This section shall not apply unless:
(1) The application for the vehicle's certificate of
ownership was submitted after July 1, 1989; and
(2) The certificate was issued pursuant to a
manufacturer's statement of origin.
3. If the vehicle is any motor vehicle other than a
motor vehicle primarily for business use, a recreational
motor vehicle, motorcycle, motortricycle, autocycle, bus, or
any commercial motor vehicle licensed for over twelve
thousand pounds and if such motor vehicle is [ten years of
age or less] model year 2013 or newer and has less than one
hundred fifty thousand miles on the odometer, the director
of revenue shall retain the odometer information provided in
the vehicle inspection report, and provide for prompt access
to such information, together with the vehicle
identification number for the motor vehicle to which such
information pertains, for a period of ten years after the
receipt of such information. This subsection shall not
apply unless:

SB 1441 3
(1) The application for the vehicle's certificate of
ownership was submitted after July 1, 1990; and
(2) The certificate was issued pursuant to a
manufacturer's statement of origin.
4. If the vehicle qualifies as a reconstructed motor
vehicle, motor change vehicle, specially constructed motor
vehicle, non-USA-std motor vehicle, as defined in section
301.010, or prior salvage as referenced in section 301.573,
the owner or lienholder shall surrender the certificate of
ownership. The owner shall make an application for a new
certificate of ownership, pay the required title fee, and
obtain the vehicle examination certificate required pursuant
to subsection 9 of section 301.190. If an insurance company
pays a claim on a salvage vehicle as defined in section
301.010 and the owner retains the vehicle, as prior salvage,
the vehicle shall only be required to meet the examination
requirements under subsection 10 of section 301.190.
Notarized bills of sale along with a copy of the front and
back of the certificate of ownership for all major component
parts installed on the vehicle and invoices for all
essential parts which are not defined as major component
parts shall accompany the application for a new certificate
of ownership. If the vehicle is a specially constructed
motor vehicle, as defined in section 301.010, two pictures
of the vehicle shall be submitted with the application. If
the vehicle is a kit vehicle, the applicant shall submit the
invoice and the manufacturer's statement of origin on the
kit. If the vehicle requires the issuance of a special
number by the director of revenue or a replacement vehicle
identification number, the applicant shall submit the
required application and application fee. All applications
required under this subsection shall be submitted with any

SB 1441 4
applicable taxes which may be due on the purchase of the
vehicle or parts. The director of revenue shall
appropriately designate "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle",
"Motor Change Vehicle", "Non-USA-Std Motor Vehicle", or
"Specially Constructed Motor Vehicle" on the current and all
subsequent issues of the certificate of ownership of such
vehicle.
5. Every insurance company that pays a claim for
repair of a motor vehicle which as the result of such
repairs becomes a reconstructed motor vehicle as defined in
section 301.010 or that pays a claim on a salvage vehicle as
defined in section 301.010 and the owner is retaining the
vehicle shall in writing notify the owner of the vehicle,
and in a first party claim, the lienholder if a lien is in
effect, that he is required to surrender the certificate of
ownership, and the documents and fees required pursuant to
subsection 4 of this section to obtain a prior salvage motor
vehicle certificate of ownership or documents and fees as
otherwise required by law to obtain a salvage certificate of
100 ownership, from the director of revenue. The insurance
101 company shall within thirty days of the payment of such
102 claims report to the director of revenue the name and
103 address of such owner, the year, make, model, vehicle
104 identification number, and license plate number of the
105 vehicle, and the date of loss and payment.
106 6. Anyone who fails to comply with the requirements of
107 this section shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
108 7. An applicant for registration may make a donation
109 of one dollar to promote a blindness education, screening
110 and treatment program. The director of revenue shall
111 collect the donations and deposit all such donations in the
112 state treasury to the credit of the blindness education,

SB 1441 5
113 screening and treatment program fund established in section
114 209.015. Moneys in the blindness education, screening and
115 treatment program fund shall be used solely for the purposes
116 established in section 209.015; except that the department
117 of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its
118 administrative costs. The donation prescribed in this
119 subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant
120 for registration at the time of issuance or renewal. The
121 director shall inquire of each applicant at the time the
122 applicant presents the completed application to the director
123 whether the applicant is interested in making the one dollar
124 donation prescribed in this subsection.
125 8. An applicant for registration may make a donation
126 of an amount not less than one dollar to promote an organ
127 donor program. The director of revenue shall collect the
128 donations and deposit all such donations in the state
129 treasury to the credit of the organ donor program fund as
130 established in sections 194.297 to 194.304. Moneys in the
131 organ donor fund shall be used solely for the purposes
132 established in sections 194.297 to 194.304, except that the
133 department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent
134 for its administrative costs. The donation prescribed in
135 this subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the
136 applicant for registration at the time of issuance or
137 renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at
138 the time the applicant presents the completed application to
139 the director whether the applicant is interested in making a
140 contribution not less than one dollar as prescribed in this
141 subsection.
142 9. An applicant for registration may make a donation
143 of one dollar to the Missouri medal of honor recipients
144 fund. The director of revenue shall collect the donations

SB 1441 6
145 and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the
146 credit of the Missouri medal of honor recipients fund as
147 established in section 226.925. Moneys in the medal of
148 honor recipients fund shall be used solely for the purposes
149 established in section 226.925, except that the department
150 of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its
151 administrative costs. The donation prescribed in this
152 subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant
153 for registration at the time of issuance or renewal. The
154 director shall inquire of each applicant at the time the
155 applicant presents the completed application to the director
156 whether the applicant is interested in making the one dollar
157 donation prescribed in this subsection.
307.350. 1. The owner of every motor vehicle as
defined in section 301.010 which is required to be
registered in this state, except:
(1) Motor vehicles having less than one hundred fifty
thousand miles[, for the ten-year period following their
model year of manufacture] and of model year 2013 or newer,
excluding prior salvage vehicles immediately following a
rebuilding process and vehicles subject to the provisions of
section 307.380;
(2) Those motor vehicles which are engaged in
interstate commerce and are proportionately registered in
this state with the Missouri highway reciprocity commission,
although the owner may request that such vehicle be
inspected by an official inspection station, and a peace
officer may stop and inspect such vehicles to determine
whether the mechanical condition is in compliance with the
safety regulations established by the United States
Department of Transportation; and

SB 1441 7
(3) Historic motor vehicles registered pursuant to
section 301.131;
(4) Vehicles registered in excess of twenty-four
thousand pounds for a period of less than twelve months;
shall submit such vehicles to a biennial inspection of their
mechanism and equipment in accordance with the provisions of
sections 307.350 to 307.390 and obtain a certificate of
inspection and approval and a sticker, seal, or other device
from a duly authorized official inspection station. The
inspection, except the inspection of school buses which
shall be made at the time provided in section 307.375, shall
be made at the time prescribed in the rules and regulations
issued by the superintendent of the Missouri state highway
patrol; but the inspection of a vehicle shall not be made
more than sixty days prior to the date of application for
registration or within sixty days of when a vehicle's
registration is transferred; however, if a vehicle was
purchased from a motor vehicle dealer and a valid inspection
had been made within sixty days of the purchase date, the
new owner shall be able to utilize an inspection performed
within ninety days prior to the application for registration
or transfer. Any vehicle manufactured as an even-numbered
model year vehicle shall be inspected and approved pursuant
to the safety inspection program established pursuant to
sections 307.350 to 307.390 in each even-numbered calendar
year and any such vehicle manufactured as an odd-numbered
model year vehicle shall be inspected and approved pursuant
to sections 307.350 to 307.390 in each odd-numbered year.
The certificate of inspection and approval shall be a
sticker, seal, or other device or combination thereof, as
the superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol

SB 1441 8
prescribes by regulation and shall be displayed upon the
motor vehicle or trailer as prescribed by the regulations
established by him. The replacement of certificates of
inspection and approval which are lost or destroyed shall be
made by the superintendent of the Missouri state highway
patrol under regulations prescribed by him.
2. For the purpose of obtaining an inspection only, it
shall be lawful to operate a vehicle over the most direct
route between the owner's usual place of residence and an
inspection station of such owner's choice, notwithstanding
the fact that the vehicle does not have a current state
registration license. It shall also be lawful to operate
such a vehicle from an inspection station to another place
where repairs may be made and to return the vehicle to the
inspection station notwithstanding the absence of a current
state registration license.
3. No person whose motor vehicle was duly inspected
and approved as provided in this section shall be required
to have the same motor vehicle again inspected and approved
for the sole reason that such person wishes to obtain a set
of any special personalized license plates available
pursuant to section 301.144 or a set of any license plates
available pursuant to section 301.142, prior to the
expiration date of such motor vehicle's current registration.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 307.390,
violation of this section shall be deemed an infraction.
✓